Washington statutes.
RCW 43.56.020

Duties of commission.

(1) The commission shall identify areas of the law in which (a) uniformity in the laws among the states and other jurisdictions is desirable and practicable and (b)(i) the congress of the United States lacks jurisdiction to act or (ii) it is preferable that the several states enact the laws.

(2) The commissioners, at the national conference of commissioners on uniform state laws or its successor, shall confer upon these matters with the commissioners appointed by other states for the same purpose and shall consider and draft uniform laws to be submitted for approval and adoption by the several states.

(3) The commission shall propose to the legislature for approval and adoption the uniform acts developed with the other commissioners and generally devise and recommend such other and further courses of action as shall accomplish such uniformity.

[ 2009 c 218 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.56.020. Prior: 1905 c 59 s 2; RRS s 8205.]